District of Columbia statutes.
24-142

Exemption from personnel and budget ceilings for Trustees and related agencies.

The Trustees described in §§ 24-102 and 24-132 and the activities and personnel of, and the funds allocated or otherwise available to, the Trustees and the agencies over which the Trustees exercise financial oversight pursuant to those sections, shall not be subject to any general personnel or budget limitations which otherwise apply to the District of Columbia government or its agencies in any appropriations act.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 763, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11282

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-1242.

Effective Dates

Section 11721 of title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 786, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, provided that except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.